Utah statutes.
13-22-12.   Grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation.

(1)  The director may, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, issue an order to deny, suspend, or revoke an application, registration, permit, or information card, upon a finding that the order is in the public interest and that:

(a)  the application for registration or renewal is incomplete or misleading in any material respect;

(b)  the applicant or registrant or any officer, director, agent, or employee of the applicant or registrant has:

(i)  violated this chapter or committed any of the prohibited acts and practices described in this chapter;

(ii)  been enjoined by any court, or is the subject of an administrative order issued in this or another state, if the injunction or order includes a finding or admission of fraud, breach of fiduciary duty, material misrepresentation, or if the injunction or order was based on a finding of lack of integrity, truthfulness, or mental competence of the applicant;

(iii)  been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude;

(iv)  obtained or attempted to obtain a registration or a permit by misrepresentation;

(v)  materially misrepresented or caused to be misrepresented the purpose and manner in which contributed funds and property will be used in connection with any solicitation;

(vi)  caused or allowed any paid solicitor to violate any rule made or order issued under this chapter by the division;

(vii)  failed to take corrective action with its solicitors who have violated this chapter or committed any of the prohibited acts and practices of this chapter;

(viii)  used, or attempted to use a name that either is deceptively similar to a name used by an existing registered or exempt charitable organization, or appears reasonably likely to cause confusion of names;

(ix)  failed to timely file with the division any report required in this chapter or by rules made under this chapter; or

(x)  failed to pay a fine imposed by the division in accordance with Section 13-22-3; or

(c)  the applicant for registration or renewal has no charitable purpose.

(2)  The director may, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, issue an order to revoke or suspend a claim of exemption filed under Subsection 13-22-8(4), upon a finding that the order is in the public interest and that:

(a)  the notice of claim of exemption is incomplete or false or misleading in any material respect; or

(b)  any provision of this chapter, or any rule made or order issued by the division under this chapter has been violated in connection with a charitable solicitation by any exempt organization.

